Wyoming, session 2025, HB0025.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-5-1105 and 31-5-1106(c) are
amended to read:
31-5-1105. Notice required of driver.
(a) The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident
resulting in injury to or death of any person, in property
damage to another or others to an apparent extent of at
least one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or in any vehicle,
excluding bicycles or any other vehicle moved solely by
human power, becoming so disabled as to prevent its normal
and safe operation, shall immediately by the quickest means
of communication give notice of the accident to:
(i) The local police department if the accident
occurs within a municipality;, otherwise or
(ii) To the nearest office of the state highway
patrol or to the office of the county sheriff.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall only apply
if the accident results in:
(i) Injury to or death of any person; or
(ii) Property damage to the extent the vehicle,
excluding bicycles or any other vehicle moved solely by
human power, is so disabled as to prevent its normal and
safe operation.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 1, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
31-5-1106. Written reports required of police
officers; reporting of vehicles struck by bullets.
(c) Every police officer who investigates a motor
vehicle accident resulting shall forward a written report
of the accident to the highway department within ten (10)
days after his investigation of the accident if the motor
vehicle accident results in:
(i) Bodily injury to or death of any person; or
(ii) Total property damage to an apparent the
extent of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more the
vehicle is so disabled as to prevent its normal and safe
operation, either:
(A) At the time of and at the scene of the
accident; or thereafter by interviewing the participants or
witnesses shall forward a written report of the accident to
the highway department within ten (10) days after his
investigation of the accident.
(B) After the motor vehicle has been moved
from the scene of the accident and the police officer is
informed by the participants or witnesses of the accident
that the motor vehicle is no longer operable.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 1, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3